src/fst/morphology/phonology.twolc
!! =================================== !
!! The Old Literary Southern Sámi morphophonological/twolc rules file !
!! =================================== !

Alphabet
 a b c d e f g h i j k l m n o p q r s t u v w x y z æ ø å
 á é ó ú í à è ò ù ì ä ë ö ü ï â ê ô û î ã ý þ ñ ð ß ç

 A B C D E F G H I J K L M N O P Q R S T U V W X Y Z Æ Ø Å
 Á É Ó Ú Í À È Ò Ù Ì Ä Ë Ö Ü Ï Â Ê Ô Û Î Ã Ý þ Ñ Ð
 i2:i !!≈ - @CODE@ does not delete e in stem
 
%^EA:0 

 %> ;

Sets

 Vow = a e i o u y æ ø å 
       á é ó ú í à è ò ù ì ä ë ö ü ï â ê ô û î ã ý ;
 Cns = b c d f g h j k l m n p q r s t v w x z ð þ ;


Rules

"Delete e in front of i and a suffix"
e:0 <=> _ %> [i|a] ;

!!€ attje>in
!!€ attj0>in

!!€ nuore>a
!!€ nuor0>an

"e to a in front of illative i"
e:a <=> _ %^EA: %> ;

!!€ attje^EA>i
!!€ attja0>i

"tj to ts in final position"
j:s <=> t _ .#. ;

!!€ almatj#
!!€ almats#
